Hawaii, session 2025, HB494.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF HAWAII: SECTION 1.  Section 92-10, Hawaii Revised Statutes, is repealed. ["§92-10  Legislative branch; applicability. Notwithstanding any provisions contained in this chapter to the contrary, open meeting requirements, and provisions regarding enforcement, penalties and sanctions, as they are to relate to the state legislature or to any of its members shall be such as shall be from time to time prescribed by the respective rules and procedures of the senate and the house of representatives, which rules and procedures shall take precedence over this part.  Similarly, provisions relating to notice, agenda and minutes of meetings, and such other requirements as may be necessary, shall also be governed by the respective rules and procedures of the senate and the house of representatives."] SECTION 2.  Statutory material to be repealed is bracketed and stricken. SECTION 3.  This Act shall take effect upon its approval. INTRODUCED BY: _____________________________